Utah statutes.
26-18-3.2.   Release of financial information.
(1) (a)  Upon request from a hospital, or a designated agent of a hospital, a
bank or other financial institution shall provide the hospital, or the
designated agent of the hospital, financial records of a patient upon the
receipt of a notarized document that includes the following patient
information:
(i)  name;
(ii)  address;
(iii)  Social Security number; and
(iv)  patient permission to release the information required by this
Subsection (1) to the bank or financial institution.
(b)  The document required by this Subsection (1) shall be signed by the
patient and acknowledged by a notary public.
(2)  A hospital, or a designated agent of the hospital, may only request the
information required under Subsection (1), if the hospital or the agent of the
hospital:
(a)  determines that the patient has no ability to pay; and
(b)  has received adequate documentation from the patient, such as a valid
driver license or passport, to verify the identity of the patient.
